Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [504B.213] CHILDREN WITH AUTISM; PROTECTION IN RENTAL PROPERTY. new text end new text begin (a) A tenant who has a child with autism living with the tenant may request a reasonable accommodation to protect the child from harm when the tenant identifies a lake, river, stream, other body of water, or other attractive nuisance, that is accessible and in close proximity to the landlord's property. Upon such request, a landlord must make reasonable modifications to policies, practices, or procedures for the rental property, or make reasonable modifications to the property or facilities on the property, unless the modifications would fundamentally alter the nature of the facilities or other structural aspects of the property. new text end new text begin (b) A landlord may require documentation from a tenant that the child is autistic unless the child's condition is readily apparent or already known to the landlord. new text end new text begin (c) A landlord who receives or accommodates a request for a reasonable accommodation under this section may not retaliate in any way against the tenant. new text end